Missouri, session 2026, SB1624.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 59.313, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 59.313,
to read as follows:
59.313. 1. The recorder of deeds in a city not within
a county may refuse any document presented for recording
that does not meet the following requirements:
(1) The document shall consist of one or more
individual pages not permanently bound nor in a continuous
form. The document shall not have any attachment stapled or
otherwise affixed to any page except as necessary to comply
with statutory requirements, provided that a document may be
stapled together for presentation for recording; a label
that is firmly attached with a bar code or return address
may be accepted for recording;
(2) The size of print or type shall not be smaller
than eight-point type and shall be in black or dark ink.
Should any document presented for recording contain type
smaller than eight-point type, such document shall be
accompanied by an exact typewritten copy not smaller than

SB 1624 2
eight-point type to be recorded contemporaneously as
additional pages of the document;
(3) The document must be of sufficient legibility to
produce a clear and legible reproduction thereof. Should
any document not be of sufficient legibility to produce a
clear and legible reproduction, such document shall be
accompanied by an exact typewritten copy not smaller than
eight-point type to be recorded contemporaneously as
additional pages of the document;
(4) The document shall be on white or light-colored
paper of not less than twenty-pound weight without
watermarks or other visible inclusions, except for plats and
surveys, which may be on materials such as Mylar or velum.
All text within the document shall be of sufficient color
and clarity to ensure that when the text is reproduced from
record, it shall be readable;
(5) All signatures on a document shall be in black or
dark ink, such that such signatures shall be of sufficient
color and clarity to ensure that when the text is reproduced
from record, it shall be readable, and shall have the
corresponding name typed, printed or stamped underneath said
signature. For documents filed in person by an interested
party or parties, the recorder of deeds of a city not within
a county may require all grantors and grantees identified
within the document or documents presented to be physically
present and sign such document or documents in the presence
of authorized recorder of deeds office personnel. The
typing or printing of any name or the applying of an
embossed or inked stamp shall not cover or otherwise
materially interfere with any part of the document, except
where provided for by law;

SB 1624 3
(6) Every document, except plats and surveys, shall
have a top margin of at least three inches of vertical space
from left to right, to be reserved for the recorder of
deeds' certification and use. All other margins on the
document shall be a minimum of three-fourths of one inch on
all sides. Nonessential information such as form numbers,
page numbers or customer notations may be placed in the
margin. A document may be recorded if a minor portion of a
seal or incidental writing extends beyond the margins. The
recorder of deeds will not incur any liability for not
showing any seal or information that extends beyond the
margins of the permanent archival record.
2. Every document containing any of the items listed
in this subsection that is presented for recording, except
plats and surveys, shall have such information on the first
page below the three-inch horizontal line:
(1) The title of the document;
(2) The date of the document;
(3) All grantors' names;
(4) All grantees' names;
(5) Any statutory addresses;
(6) The legal description or descriptions of the
property; and
(7) Reference book and page for statutory
requirements, if applicable.
If there is not sufficient room on the first page for all
the required information, the page reference within the
document where the information is set out shall be placed on
the first page.
3. From January 1, 2002, documents which do not meet
the requirements set forth in this section may be recorded

SB 1624 4
for an additional fee of twenty-five dollars, which shall be
deposited in the recorders' fund established pursuant to
subsection 1 of section 59.319.
4. Documents which are exempt from format requirements
and which the recorder of deeds may record include the
following:
(1) Documents which were signed prior to January 1,
2002;
(2) Military separation papers;
(3) Documents executed outside the United States;
(4) Certified copies of documents, including birth and
death certificates;
(5) Any document where one of the original parties is
deceased or otherwise incapacitated; and
(6) Judgments or other documents formatted to meet
court requirements.
5. Any document rejected by a recorder of deeds shall
be returned to the preparer or presenter accompanied by an
explanation of the reason it could not be recorded.
6. Recorders of deeds shall be allowed fees for their
services as follows:
100 (1) For recording every deed or instrument: ten
101 dollars for the first page and five dollars for each page
102 thereafter;
103 (2) For copying or reproducing any recorded
104 instrument, except surveys and plats: three dollars for the
105 first page and two dollars for each page thereafter;
106 (3) For every certificate and seal, except when
107 recording an instrument: two dollars;
108 (4) For recording a plat or survey of a subdivision,
109 outlots or condominiums: forty-four dollars for each sheet
110 of drawings and calculations based on a size of not to

SB 1624 5
111 exceed twenty-four inches in width by eighteen inches in
112 height, plus ten dollars for each page of other materials;
113 (5) For recording a survey of one tract of land, in
114 the form of one sheet not to exceed twenty-four inches in
115 width by eighteen inches in height: eight dollars;
116 (6) For copying a plat or survey: eight dollars for
117 each page;
118 (7) For every certified copy of a marriage license or
119 application for a marriage license: five dollars;
120 (8) For releasing on the margin: eight dollars for
121 each item released;
122 (9) For a document which releases or assigns more than
123 one item: seven dollars and fifty cents for each item beyond
124 one released or assigned in addition to any other charges
125 which may apply; and
126 (10) For duplicate reels of microfilm: thirty dollars
127 each.
128 For all other use of equipment, personnel services and
129 office space the recorder of deeds shall set attendant fees.
✓